src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Somali language are references to things.

! TODO: need to go through these and check, particularly subj clitics and
!       negative, f.eks,. aadan / aanad, and others
!

LEXICON Pronouns
  Pronoun ;

LEXICON Pronoun 
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
PronDeterminer ;
DefiniteDemonstratives ;
Reflexive ; 
ImpersonalP ;
Clit_pron ;
Quantity ; 
Indefinite_P ; 
Object ;
Obj_Pron_2 ;

! TODO: compare person tags here with those in verbs

! Convert these to some form that uses only anig- adig- 

LEXICON Personal
aniga+Pron+Pers+Short+1Sg:an     Clitics ; ! 1pSg
aniga+Pron+Pers+1Sg:anig     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pSg
adiga+Pron+Pers+2Sg:adig     Pronoun_case ; ! 2pSg
isaga+Pron+Pers+3SgM:isag Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgMasc
iyada+Pron+Pers+3SgF:iyad  Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgFem, 3pPl

anaga+Pron+Pers+1PlExcl:anag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl
annaga+Pron+Pers+1PlExcl:annag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl

inaga+Pron+Pers+1PlIncl:inag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl
innaga+Pron+Pers+1PlIncl:innag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl

idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl:idink   Pronoun_case ; ! 2pPl

iyaga+Pron+Pers+3Pl:iyag  Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgFem, 3pPl
iyaga+Pron+Pers+Short+3Pl:iya  Clitics ; ! 3pSgFem, 3pPl

! TODO: definitions, tags
adaa+Pron+TODO:adaa Clitics ;
adaan+Pron+TODO:adaan Clitics ;
adiyo+Pron+TODO:adiyo Clitics ;
adna+Pron+TODO:adna Clitics ;
adoo+Pron+TODO:adoo Clitics ;
adse+Pron+TODO:adse Clitics ;
aduu+Pron+TODO:aduu Clitics ;
amba+Pron+TODO:amba Clitics ;
anaa+Pron+TODO:anaa Clitics ;
aniyo+Pron+TODO:aniyo Clitics ;
anoo+Pron+TODO:anoo Clitics ;
anuun+Pron+TODO:anuun Clitics ;
idinna+Pron+TODO:idinna Clitics ;

LEXICON Object
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj:na		FINAL ; 
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj:ina		FINAL ; 
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj:i		FINAL ; 
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj:ku		FINAL ; 
idin+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj:idin		FINAL ; 

LEXICON Pronoun_case
+Nom:u		Clitics ;				! TEST:anigu,anigu
+Abs:a		Clitics ;				! TEST:aniga,aniga

LEXICON Clit_pron
aan+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Sg:aan           ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg
aad+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Sg:aad           ShortNeg ; ! 2pSg
uu+Pron+Pers+Subj+3SgM:uu         ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgMasc
ay+Pron+Pers+Subj+3SgF:ay          ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgFem
aannu+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Excl:aannu   ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
aan+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Incl:aan       ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
aynu+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Incl:aynu     ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Excl
aydin+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Pl:aydin       ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
aad+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Pl:aad           ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
ay+Pron+Pers+Subj+3Pl:ay             ShortNeg ; ! 3pPl

aan+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Sg+Neg:aanan           FINAL ; ! 1pSg
aad+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Sg+Neg:aanad           FINAL ; ! 2pSg
uu+Pron+Pers+Subj+3SgM+Neg:aanu         FINAL ; ! 3pSgMasc
uu+Pron+Pers+Subj+3SgM+Neg:uusan        FINAL ;
ay+Pron+Pers+Subj+3SgF+Neg:aanay          FINAL ; ! 3pSgFem
aannu+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Excl+Neg:aanannu   FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
aan+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanan       FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
aynu+Pron+Pers+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanaynu     FINAL ; ! 1pSg Excl
aydin+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aanaydin       FINAL ; ! 2pPl
aad+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aanad           FINAL ; ! 2pPl
ay+Pron+Pers+Subj+3Pl+Neg:aanay             FINAL ; ! 3pPl

aad+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Sg+Neg:aadan           FINAL ; ! 2pSg
aydin+Pron+Pers+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aydaan       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl

! For +CS/baa+Foc/L
LEXICON Clit_pron_aff
! TODO: +Subj?
+1Sg:aan           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg
+2Sg:aad           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pSg
+3SgM:uu         Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pSgMasc
+3SgF:ay          Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pSgFem
+1Pl+Excl:aannu   Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Incl
+1Pl+Incl:aan       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Incl
+1Pl+Incl:aynu     Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Excl
+2Pl:aydin       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl
+2Pl:aad           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl
+3Pl:ay             Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pPl
+Subj+Null:aa             Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pPl

+1Sg+Neg:aanan           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg
+2Sg+Neg:aanad           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pSg
+3SgM+Neg:aanu         Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pSgMasc
+3SgM+Neg:uusan         Clitics ; ! 3pSgMasc
+3SgF+Neg:aanay          Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pSgFem
+1Pl+Excl+Neg:aanannu   Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Incl
+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanan       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Incl
+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanaynu     Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 1pSg Excl
+2Pl+Neg:aanaydin       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl
+2Pl+Neg:aanad           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl
+3Pl+Neg:aanay             Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 3pPl

! TODO: which way?
+2Sg+Neg:aadan           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pSg
+2Pl+Neg:aadan           Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl
+2Pl+Neg:aydaan       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl


! Using these with waxa and other CS, so tags are shorter
LEXICON Clit_pron_short_tag
+Subj+1Sg:aan           ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg
+Subj+2Sg:aad           ShortNeg ; ! 2pSg
+Subj+3SgM:uu         ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgF:ay          ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+1Pl+Excl:aannu   ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl:aan       ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl:aynu     ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Excl
+Subj+2Pl:aydin       ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+2Pl:aad           ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+3Pl:ay             ShortNeg ; ! 3pPl

+Subj+3SgF+Sty/TODO:ey          Clitics ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+3Pl+Sty/TODO:ey             Clitics ; ! 3pPl

+Subj+1Sg+Neg:aanan           Clitics ; ! 1pSg
+Subj+2Sg+Neg:aanad           Clitics ; ! 2pSg
+Subj+3SgM+Neg:aanu         Clitics ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgM+Neg:uusan         Clitics ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgF+Neg:aanay          Clitics ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+1Pl+Excl+Neg:aanannu   Clitics ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanan       Clitics ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aanaynu     Clitics ; ! 1pSg Excl
+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aanaydin       Clitics ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aanad           Clitics ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+3Pl+Neg:aanay             Clitics ; ! 3pPl

! Which way?
+Subj+2Sg+Neg:aadan           Clitics ; ! 2pSg
+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aydaan       Clitics/NoFoc ; ! 2pPl

LEXICON Clit_pron_short_tag_hightone
+Subj+1Sg:aan´´           ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg
+Subj+2Sg:aad´´           ShortNeg ; ! 2pSg
+Subj+3SgM:uu´´         ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgF:ay´´          ShortNeg ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+1Pl+Excl:aan´´nu   ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Use/NG:aan´´       ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl:aann´´       ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl:ayn´´u     ShortNeg ; ! 1pSg Excl
+Subj+2Pl:ayd´´in       ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+2Pl:aad´´           ShortNeg ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+3Pl:ay´´             ShortNeg ; ! 3pPl

+Subj+3SgF+Sty/TODO:ey´´          Clitics ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+3Pl+Sty/TODO:ey´´            Clitics ; ! 3pPl

+Subj+1Sg+Neg:aan´´an           Clitics ; ! 1pSg
+Subj+2Sg+Neg:aan´´ad           Clitics ; ! 2pSg
+Subj+3SgM+Neg:aan´´u         Clitics ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgM+Neg:uusan         Clitics ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Subj+3SgF+Neg:aan´´ay          Clitics ; ! 3pSgFem
+Subj+1Pl+Excl+Neg:aan´´annu   Clitics ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aan´´an       Clitics ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Subj+1Pl+Incl+Neg:aan´´aynu     Clitics ; ! 1pSg Excl
+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aan´´aydin       Clitics ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+2Pl+Neg:aan´´ad           Clitics ; ! 2pPl
+Subj+3Pl+Neg:aan´´ay             Clitics ; ! 3pPl


LEXICON ShortNeg
+Neg:an        Clitics ;
Clitics ;


! Saeed (1993) notes some pre-conjunction pronouns too. Need to see these in use.
! an     1pSg
! ad     2pSg
! is     3pSgM
! iya    3pSgF
! anna   1pPlExcl
! inna   1pPlIncl
! idin   2pPl
! iya    3pPl

! TODO: are these determiners? seem similar to oo dhan, but not quite, quantifiers?

LEXICON PronDeterminer
uun+Pron+Det+Def:uun Masc "each" ;
uun+Pron+Det+Indef:uun Clitics "each" ;
yaa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:yaa´´ Clitics "who" ;
ku+Pron+Interr+Masc+Subj+Interr/ma:kuma Clitics "who" ;
tu+Pron+Interr+Fem+Subj+Interr/ma:tuma Clitics "who" ;


LEXICON DefiniteDemonstratives
! These are basically the same as definite suffixes
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Abs+Near:kaas      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Gen+Near:kaas      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Near+Near:kaasi      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Abs+Close:kan      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Gen+Close:kan      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Abs+Prox:ka      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Gen+Prox:ka      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Nom+Prox:ku      Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Abs+Dist:kii     Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Nom+Dist:kii     Clitics ;
ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc+Voc:kow     Clitics ;


ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Abs+Close:taas      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Gen+Close:taas      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Nom+Close:taasi      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Abs+Close:tan      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Gen+Close:tan      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Abs+Prox:ta      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Gen+Prox:ta      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Nom+Prox:tu      Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Abs+Dist:tii     Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Nom+Dist:tii     Clitics ;
ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem+Voc:tay        Clitics ;

PossessiveDemonstratives ;


LEXICON PossessiveDemonstratives
	@P.Gender.Fem@	_PDFx ;
	@P.Gender.Masc@	_PDMx ;

	LEXICON _PDFx
	ta+Pron+Dem+Sg+Fem:t      Possessive ;

	LEXICON _PDMx
	ka+Pron+Dem+Sg+Masc:k     Possessive ;


LEXICON Demonstrative
in+Pron+Dem:in NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg "this" ; ! skip noun tags, straight to +Indef/+Def
in+Pron+Dem+Indef+Sg+Neg/ma:inna Clitics "not this" ; ! skip noun tags, straight to +Indef/+Def

! TODO: sg or pl?
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Indef:kuwo Clitics "these" ;
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Abs+Prox:kuwa Clitics "these" ;
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Abs+Close:kuwan Clitics "these" ;
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Nom+Close:kuwanu Clitics "these" ;
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Abs+Near:kuwaas Clitics "these" ;

kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Abs+Near+Adp/u:kuwaasoo Clitics "these" ;
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Abs+Near+Clit/oo+CS+Appos:kuwaasoo Clitics "these" ;

kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Def+Nom:kuwii Clitics "this" ; ! TODO: this, plural?
kuwa+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs:kuwii Clitics "this" ; ! TODO: this, plural?
! TODO: can probably just extend this by including the distance lexicon

! TODO: kuwii 

kan+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Abs+Close:kan			Clitics ;
kan+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Nom+Close:kanu			Clitics ;
kan+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Nom+Close:kani			Clitics ;

tan+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Abs+Close:tan			Clitics ;
tan+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Close:tanu			Clitics ;
tan+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Close:tani			Clitics ;

kaas+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Abs+Near:kaas			Clitics ;	
kaas+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Nom+Near:kaasu			Clitics ;	
kaas+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Nom+Near:kaasi			Clitics ;	

kaas+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Nom+Near+Adp/u:kaasoo			Clitics ;	
kaas+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg+Abs+Near+Clit/oo+CS+Appos:kaasoo			Clitics ;	

taas+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Abs+Near:taas			Clitics ;	
taas+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Near:taasu			Clitics ;	
taas+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Near:taasi			Clitics ;	

taas+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Near+Adp/u:taasoo			Clitics ;	
taas+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom+Near#oo+CS+Appos:taasoo			Clitics ;	


LEXICON Reflexive
is+Refl:is Clitics ;
is+Pron+Pers+Sem/Obj+Refl:is FINAL ;
is+Pron+Pers+Sem/Obj+Refl+Nom:isu FINAL ;
is+Pron+Pers+Sem/Obj+Refl+Abs:isa FINAL ;
isugu+Pron+Pers+Refl+Nom:isugu FINAL ; ! Refl independent? TODO: check

LEXICON ImpersonalP 
la+Pron+Impers+Subj:la FINAL ;

LEXICON Obj_Pron_2
kay+Pron+Pers+Poss+1Sg:kay´´ FINAL ;
kaa+Pron+Pers+Poss+2Sg:kaa´´ FINAL ;
kayo+Pron+Pers+Poss+1Pl+Excl:kayo´´ FINAL ;
keen+Pron+Pers+Poss+1Pl+Incl:keen´´ FINAL ;
kiin+Pron+Pers+Poss+2Pl:kiin´´ FINAL ;
! no 3p

! TODO: these could also be combinations of ka and something else? 

! Wáy igá kíin qaadeen
! Waa-ay i-ká kíin qaadeen
! They took me away from you.

! N ? ?		cidna		"no-one"
! N ? ? 		cidina		"no-one, +Subj marking with negative verbs"
! waxba 		"nothing"

! Finnish: kukaan+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Nom

LEXICON Quantity
waxba+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Abs:waxba		FINAL 	"nothing" ;
cidna+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Abs:cidna		FINAL	"no-one" ;
cidina+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Nom:cidina		FINAL	"no-one" ;



LEXICON Indefinite_P
wax+Pron+Indef+Abs:wax FINAL ; 

! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :
